src/morphology/phonology.twolc
!  ===============================================
!! !!!The Võro morphophonological/twolc rules file 
!  ===============================================


Alphabet
a b d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s š t u v y z ž õ ü ä ö
A B D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V Y Z Ž Õ Ü Ä Ö

b́ d́ f́ ǵ h́ ḱ ĺ ḿ ń ṕ ŕ ś t́ v́ ź

B́ D́ F́ Ǵ H́ Ḱ Ĺ Ḿ Ń Ṕ Ŕ Ś T́ V́ Ź

 ʼ

!! !!Special letters
u̬  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ u plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
U̬  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ u plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
ü̬  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ü plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
Ü̬  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ü plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
i̬  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ i plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
I̬  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ i plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
õ̭  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ õ plus U+032D COMBINING CIRCUMFLEX ACCENT BELOW
Õ̭  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ õ plus U+032D COMBINING CIRCUMFLEX ACCENT BELOW
ˋ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ U+02CB MODIFIER LETTER GRAVE ACCENT other parts of stem
%{ˋØ%}:0 !!≈ {{{@CODE@ — U+02CB MODIFIER LETTER GRAVE ACCENT used in rules}}}
ˋ:0 !!≈ __@CODE@__ — U+02CB MODIFIER LETTER GRAVE ACCENT used outside of rules, this is temporary removal 2017-04-20


!! !!Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä"
!! {{{
 %{aä%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä" AÄ1:a AÄ1:ä AÄ1:0
 %{ae%}:a  !!= @CODE@ — Vowel harmony with "a/e/õ" passive tahetu
 %{aõ%}:a  !!= @CODE@ — Vowel harmony with "a/e/õ" passive sõidõtu
 %{äe%}:ä   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel harmony with "ä/e/õ" passive
 %{eõ%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel harmony with "e/õ"
 %{uü%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel harmony with "u/ü"
 %{öü%}:ö   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel raising
 %{ou%}:o   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel raising
 %{ei%}:e   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel raising
 %{õy%}:õ   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel raising
 %{ao%}:a   !!= @CODE@ — Vowel raising

 %{eØ%}:e   !!= @CODE@ — ütlemä:üt%{eØ%}l  
 %{õØ%}:õ   !!= @CODE@ — ütlemä:üt%{eØ%}l  
 %{Øõ%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — juurdlõma:juur%{dØ%}%{0õ%}l

 %{dØ%}:d   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dv%}:d   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dn%}:d   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}
 %{dl%}:d   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}

 %{ij%}:i   !!= @CODE@ ellä%{ij%}
 %{gv%}:g   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gl%}:g   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gØ%}:g   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas argnõma:ar%{gØ%}
 %{uv%}:u   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{üv%}:ü   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{hØ%}:h   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{jØ%}:j   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kØ%}:k   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{lØ%}:l   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{mØ%}:m   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{nØ%}:n   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pØ%}:p   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas oppama:o%{pØ%}pama
 %{rØ%}:r   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{sØ%}:s   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas närväs:när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}
 %{vØ%}:v   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{Øp%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — häbü:häbü+N:hä%{Øp%}%{pbØ%}ü
 %{Øt%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — koda:ko%{Øt%}%{tdØ%}a
 %{Øk%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — nägo:nä%{Øk%}%{kgØ%}o

 %{bv%}:b   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas närväs:när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}
 %{dr%}:d   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas parras:par%{dr%}a%{sØ%}
 %{bm%}:b   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}
 %{pb%}:p   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pb%}:b   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{tØ%}:t   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{td%}:t   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{t́d́%}:t́   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kg%}:k   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kaigas:kai%{kg%}as

 %{pbØ%}:p  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pbØ%}:b  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pbØ%}:0  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{pbv%}:p   %{pbv%}:b   %{pbv%}:v  !!= @CODE@ — tõbi: tõvõ tõpõ tõppõ

 %{tdØ%}:d  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{kgØ%}:k  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kgØ%}:g  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kgØ%}:0  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{jiØ%}:i  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas vari:var%{jiØ%}o
 %{qmn%}:q  !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{qn%}:q   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{dd́Ø%}:d   !!= @CODE@
 %{dd́n%}:d   !!= @CODE@
 %{dd́r%}:d   !!= @CODE@
 %{dd́v%}:d   !!= @CODE@
 %{dd́Ø%}:d   !!= @CODE@
 %{gǵv%}:g   !!= @CODE@
 %{gǵØ%}:g   !!= @CODE@
 %{kḱg%}:k    %{kḱg%}:ḱ    %{kḱg%}:g   !!= @CODE@
 %{kḱØ%}:k   !!= @CODE@
 %{pṕb%}:p   %{pṕb%}:ṕ    %{pṕb%}:b   !!= @CODE@
 %{tt́d%}:t    %{tt́d%}:t́    %{tt́d%}:d   !!= @CODE@
 %{tt́Ø%}:t   !!= @CODE@ täh%{tt́Ø%}
 %{pṕØ%}:p   !!= @CODE@

!! }}}

!! !!Palatalization of consonants
!! {{{
 %{bb́%}:b   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dd́%}:d   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{ff́%}:f   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gǵ%}:g   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{hh́%}:h   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kḱ%}:k   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{lĺ%}:l    !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{mḿ%}:m   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{nń%}:n   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pṕ%}:p   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{rŕ%}:r   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{sś%}:s   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{tt́%}:t   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{vv́%}:v   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{zź%}:z   !!= @CODE@ — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dd́n%}:d !!= @CODE@
!! }}}

!! !!Miscellaneous other symbols
!! {{{
 %{XV%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — This is used for echoing the previous vowel
 %{XC%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — This is used for lengthening a consonant
 %^I7:0     !!= @CODE@ — This appears in stem vaoma:va%^I7o for vaio
 %^K7:0     !!= @CODE@ — This appears in stem väemä:vä%^K7e for väkeq
 %^V7:0     !!= @CODE@ — This appears in stem häömä:hä%^V7ö for hävvü
 %^T7:0     !!= @CODE@ — This appears in stem kaoma:ka%^T7o for katoq
 %^Y7:õ     !!= @CODE@ — This appears for syna = s%^Y7na and is rendered as õ in the norm
!! }}}

!! !!Triggers
!! {{{
   %^OO2Õ:0   !!= @CODE@ — joo%^OO2Õ%>i:j0õ0%>i
   %^CC2C:0   !!= @CODE@ — att%^CC2C%>m%{aä%} atma
 %^PSS:0      !!= @CODE@ vowel in passive tahetu, sõidõtu, eletü
 %^ÄI2ÄÄ:0   !!= @CODE@ — päiv%^ÄI2ÄÄ%>ä: päävä
 %{front%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — front harmony
 %{back%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — back harmony
%^ErrorBack:0 !!= @CODE@ — +Err/Orth+Clt:%>kinaq in front harmony context BHARM disallowance
 %{PrsSg1%}:0 !!= @CODE@ — this helps with %{eõ%}:i̬
!! }}}

!! {{{

 %{td%}:t 	!!= @CODE@ HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kg%}:k 	!!= @CODE@ HJK and KimmoK ideas kaigas:kai%{kg%}as

 %{qmn%}:q 	!!= @CODE@ HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{qn%}:q 	!!= @CODE@ HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{XV%}:0		!!= @CODE@ This is used for echoing the previous vowel
 %{XC%}:0	!!= @CODE@ This is used for lengthening a consonant
 %^I7:0         !!= @CODE@ This appears in stem vaoma:va%^I7o for vaio
 %^K7:0         !!= @CODE@  This appears in stem väemä:vä%^K7e for väkeq
 %^V7:0         !!= @CODE@ This appears in stem häömä:hä%^V7ö for hävvü
 %^T7:0         !!= @CODE@ This appears in stem kaoma:ka%^T7o for katoq

%^Y7:õ  !!= __@CODE@__  This appears for syna = s%^Y7na and is rendered as õ in the norm
!! }}}



! this k is not effected by gradation
K1:k
!! {{{
%^NoGrad:0    !!= @CODE@ — This will be placed after a stem to break Gradation
%^APOCH:0     !!= @CODE@ — This causes apochope: puhksama vs puhastaq
%^StrD2T:0    !!= @CODE@ — This changes g,d,b => k,t,p

%^G1:0	      !!= @CODE@ — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 0, also t, k
%^G2:0	      !!= @CODE@ — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 b, also t, k
%^G3:0	      !!= @CODE@ — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 p, also t, k
%^G4:0	      !!= @CODE@ — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for p p, also t, k

%^WGStem:0    !!= @CODE@ — This weakens "kipõń" to "kibõna", "ompel" to "ommel"
%^StrGStem:0  !!= @CODE@ — This strengthens "perädü" to "perätüt"
%^XStrGStem:0 !!= @CODE@ — This extra-strengthens "sõda" to "sõtta"


%^Pen:0       !!= @CODE@ — This moves us to penultimate coda
%^PAL:0	      !!= @CODE@ — Palatalization
%^NoPAL:0	      !!= @CODE@ — NoPalatalization


%^PenWGStem:0 !!= @CODE@ — This weakens "kipõń" to "kibõna"
%^PenVowRM:0  !!= @CODE@ — syncope tapõld : taplõma 
%^D2S:0       !!= @CODE@ — The ti => si
%^TS2S:0      !!= @CODE@ — The -ts- => -s-
%^I2J:0       !!= @CODE@ — The i => j change
%^PLPRT:0     !!= @CODE@ — The a:o attested in Plural kana:kanno and prt
%^VOWRaise:0  !!= @CODE@ — Raises vowel
%^VOWLower:0  !!= @CODE@ — Lowers vowel
%^XLowerVow:0 !!= @CODE@ — Lowers vowel two levels
%^VOWLowerDelab:0  !!= @CODE@ — Lowers vowel and delabializes it
%^XLowerVowDelab:0 !!= @CODE@ — Lowers vowel two levels and delabializes it
%^U2E:0       !!= @CODE@ — lowers u:õ and ü:e delabializes and lowers
%^U2A:0       !!= @CODE@ — lowers u:a and ü:ä delabializes and lowers
%^VowRM:0     !!= @CODE@ — this will remove stem final vowel
%^CnsRM:0     !!= @CODE@ — this will remove stem final consonant tervüs:tervü
!! }}}

!Outlining 2 grades (3,4) (audibly, orthographically)  ku%{Øp%}p : kupu kuppu
!Outlining 2 grades (audibly, orthographically)  tä%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}i : tädi täti tätti
!Outlining 2 grades (audibly, orthographically)  tü%{kØ%}k : tükü tükkü

!Outlining 2 grades (audibly, NOT orthographically)  kasv : kasvo kasvo

!Outlining 3 grades (2,3,4) (audibly, orthographically)  tö%{pØ%}%{pbØ%}i : töbi töpi töppi
!Outlining 3 grades (audibly, orthographically)  tä%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}i : tädi täti tätti
!Outlining 3 grades (audibly, orthographically)  pi%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}i : pigi piki pikki

!Outlining 3 grades (audibly, NOT orthographically)  pi%{nØ%}ni : pini pinni pinni

!Outlining 4 grades (1,2,3,4) (audibly, orthographically)  u%{pØ%}%{pbØ%}a : ua uba upa uppa
!Outlining 4 grades (audibly, orthographically)  la%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}o : lao lado lato latto
!Outlining 4 grades (audibly, orthographically)  la%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}o : lao lago lako lakko

!Outlining 4 grades (audibly, NOT orthographically)  u%{pØ%}%{pbØ%}a : ua uba upa uppa


%: !used with Proper nouns
%- !Hyphen in  constructions 
%>
#   ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

Cx
Cy
X
Y

%^LVow:0
%^LCns:0
%^WCns:0
%^AtoO:0
%^ÄtoÖ:0
%^OddSyll:0
%^StretchSyll2:0
%^SyllBr:0
%^E1:0

;


Sets

VowBack = a o u õ y õ̭ u̬ ;
VowFront = ä ö ü ü̬ ;
VowNeutral = e i i̬ ; 
VowNonHigh = a o ä ö e õ ;
Vow = a o u ä ö ü e i õ y õ̭ ü̬ u̬ i̬ ;

VowInZero = a o u ä ö ü e i õ ;

Cns = b d g j k l m p r s t v  f h n q š z ž 
b́
d́
ǵ
ń ḱ ĺ ḿ ṕ ŕ ś ź 
t́ v́ f́ h́ 
;

CnsInZero = b d g j k l m p r s t v ;

CnsVoiced = j l m n r v ;

ArchVow = %{ae%} %{aõ%} %{äe%} %{eõ%} %{uü%} %{öü%} %{ou%} %{ei%} %{õy%} %{ao%};

ArchCns =  %{hØ%} %{jØ%} %{kØ%} %{lØ%} %{mØ%} %{nØ%} %{pØ%} %{rØ%} %{sØ%} %{tØ%} %{vØ%} %{bv%} %{bm%} %{pb%} %{td%} %{gv%} %{gl%} %{gØ%} %{kg%} %{dØ%} %{dv%} %{dl%} %{dr%} %{dn%} %{pbØ%} %{tdØ%} %{kgØ%} %{sś%} %{lĺ%} %{rŕ%} %{nń%} %{ij%} %{kḱ%} %{hh́%} %{t́d́%} %{gǵ%} %{dd́Ø%} %{dd́n%} %{dd́r%} %{dd́v%} %{gǵv%} 
%{pṕb%} 
%{dd́%}
%{vv́%}
%{ff́%}
%{tt́%}
%{tt́d%}
%{kḱg%}
%{kḱØ%}
%{mḿ%}
; 






ArchCnsInZero =  %{gØ%} %{hØ%} %{jØ%} %{kØ%} %{lØ%} %{mØ%} %{nØ%} %{pØ%} %{rØ%} %{sØ%} %{tØ%} %{vØ%} %{pbØ%} %{tdØ%} %{kgØ%} ;

Letters = Vow Cns ;

HarmDummies = %{back%} %{front%} ;

Definitions

!! Onset consonant or word boundary
OnSetC = [:Cns (Cns:) |#|%>] ;

! Back Harmony
BHARM = [ %{back%}: \[ # | %{front%}: ]* ] ;
